California, session 20252026, AB2651.
do enact as follows:SECTION 1. This act shall be known, and may be cited, as the Informed Parents, Healthy Schools Act.SEC. 2. Section 120141 is added to the Health and Safety Code, to read:120141. (a) The State Department of Public Health shall establish, and update as needed, the immunization rate necessary to prevent the spread of each communicable disease listed in subdivision (b) of Section 120335.(b) The department shall establish notification procedures to annually inform a private or public elementary or secondary school, childcare center, day nursery, nursery school, family day care home, or development center, and the county public health department and the local health officer, as appointed pursuant to Section 101000, when, at that school or institution, an immunization rate for one or more vaccines against one or more diseases listed in subdivision (b) of Section 120335 is determined to fall below the relevant immunization rate established by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of this section. The notification shall be written by the department, and shall be subject to all of the following requirements:(1) The notification shall be distributed in the same school year that the determination described in this subdivision is made.(2) The notification shall include all of the following: (A) The immunization rate established by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) for each vaccine against each disease listed under subdivision (b) of Section 120335 for both the current and prior school years. vaccine.(B) For each vaccine against each disease the diseases listed in subdivision (b) of Section 120335, the immunization rate at the school or institution where the immunization rate is determined to have fallen below the immunization rate established by the department. department for both the current and prior school years. Immunization rates for each vaccine shall be listed by the grade level included in the calculation, and include the approximate period of time that the immunization rate applies to.(C) A statement that no immunization changes are legally required if the immunization rate at the school or institution would be at or above the immunization rate established by the department pursuant to subdivision (a) were the immunization rates of children with exemptions excluded from the immunization-rate calculation. children with permanent or temporary medical exemptions, children enrolled in independent study programs who do not receive classroom-based instruction, and children who have been conditionally admitted to the school or institution are not included in the immunization rate calculation.(D) Evidence-based explanations regarding the importance of maintaining immunization rates at levels sufficient to prevent disease transmission, and the increased risk of outbreaks and spreading of communicable diseases when immunization rates fall below these levels.(E) Information, developed or approved by the department, regarding accessible locations where children and their families can obtain the immunizations required pursuant to Section 120335, including, but not limited to, contact information for the local health department and internet websites that provide immunization location information.(F) A link or quick response (QR) code to the “Shots for School” webpage maintained by the department or a successor webpage, and any additional webpages that contain immunization resources for parents and guardians.(3) The notification shall be translated into any language, in addition to English, that is spoken by 15 percent or more of enrolled children.(c) In implementing this section, the department shall apply existing data de-identification standards and methodologies to protect individual privacy, including, but not limited to, when reporting immunization rates for a school or institution with low enrollment could reasonably risk the identification of an individual child. Action taken by the department pursuant to this section shall be consistent with applicable state and federal privacy laws.(d)This section does not apply to a child in a home-based private school or a child who is enrolled in an independent study program pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code and does not receive classroom-based instruction. (e)(d) For purposes of this section, a child has an exemption, and is excluded from the immunization-rate calculation, calculation if the child meets one of the following criteria:(1) The child has a permanent or temporary medical exemption under Section 120370 or 120372.(2) The child has been conditionally admitted to the school or institution pursuant to Section 120340.(3) The child is enrolled in an independent study program pursuant to Article 5.5 (commencing with Section 51745) of Chapter 5 of Part 28 of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Education Code and does not receive classroom-based instruction.SEC. 3. Section 120141.1 is added to the Health and Safety Code, immediately following Section 120141, to read:120141.1. (a) When a school or institution receives notice a notification from the State Department of Public Health department under Section 120141, the school or institution shall, within 10 business days of receiving notice, that notification, distribute that notification to the parents or guardians of enrolled children a notification in the manner prescribed by the department pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 120141. in a manner determined by the school or institution.(b) The governing authority of a school or institution described in subdivision (a) shall cooperate with the department in carrying out the requirements of this section.(c) For purposes of this section, “school or institution” means a private or public elementary or secondary school, childcare center, day nursery, nursery school, family day care home, or development center.SEC. 4. If the Commission on State Mandates determines that this act contains costs mandated by the state, reimbursement to local agencies and school districts for those costs shall be made pursuant to Part 7 (commencing with Section 17500) of Division 4 of Title 2 of the Government Code.